Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 23 Coastal Resources Management Council
46-23-6.
Powers and duties — Rights-of-way.

In order to properly manage coastal resources the council has the following powers and duties:

Planning and management.

The primary responsibility of the council shall be the continuing planning for and management of the resources of the state’s coastal region. The council shall be able to make any studies of conditions, activities, or problems of the state’s coastal region needed to carry out its responsibilities.

The resources management process shall include the following basic phases:

Identify all of the state’s coastal resources, water, submerged land, air space, fin fish, shellfish, minerals, physiographic features, and so forth.

Evaluate these resources in terms of their quantity, quality, capability for use, and other key characteristics.

Determine the current and potential uses of each resource.

Determine the current and potential problems of each resource.

Formulate plans and programs for the management of each resource, identifying permitted uses, locations, protection measures, and so forth.

Carry out these resources management programs through implementing authority and coordination of state, federal, local, and private activities.

Formulation of standards where these do not exist, and reevaluation of existing standards.

To develop comprehensive programs for dredging in tidal waters and related beneficial use, disposal, monitoring dewatering and transportation of dredge materials.

To accept and administer loans and grants from the federal government and from other sources, public or private, for the carrying out of any of its functions, which loans or grants shall not be expended for other than the purposes for which provided.

To encourage, participate in, or conduct studies, investigations, research, and demonstrations relating to dredging, disposal of dredge materials and transportation thereof in the tidal waters of the state as the coastal resources management council may deem advisable and necessary for the discharge of its duties under this chapter.

To collect and disseminate information relating to dredging, disposal of dredge materials and transportation thereof within the tidal waters of the state.

To work with the appropriate federal and state agencies to develop as provided for in this chapter and in chapter 6.1 of this title, a comprehensive plan for dredging in tidal waters and related beneficial use, disposal, monitoring dewatering and transportation of dredge materials.

To apply for, accept and expend grants and bequests of funds, for the purpose of carrying out the lawful responsibilities of the coastal resources management council.

An initial series of resources management activities shall be initiated through this basic process, then each phase shall continuously be recycled and used to modify the council’s resources management programs and keep them current.

Planning and management programs shall be formulated in terms of the characteristics and needs of each resource or group of related resources. However, all plans and programs shall be developed around basic standards and criteria, including:

The need and demand for various activities and their impact upon ecological systems.

The degree of compatibility of various activities.

The capability of coastal resources to support various activities.

Water quality standards set by the director of the department of environmental management.

Consideration of plans, studies, surveys, inventories, and so forth prepared by other public and private sources.

Consideration of contiguous land uses and transportation facilities.

Whenever possible consistency with the state guide plan.

The council shall prepare, adopt, administer, and cause to be implemented, including specifically through its powers of coordination as set forth in subdivision (3) of this section, a marine resources development plan and such special area management plans as the council may determine to be appropriate or desirable as follows:

Marine resources development plan.

The purpose of the marine resources development plan shall be to provide an integrated strategy for: (a) improving the health and functionality of Rhode Island’s marine ecosystem; (b) providing for appropriate marine-related economic development; and (c) promoting the use and enjoyment of Rhode Island’s marine resources by the people of the state.

The marine resources development plan shall include specific goals and objectives necessary to accomplish its purposes, performance measures to determine progress toward achieving such goals and objectives, and an implementation program.

The marine resources development plan shall be prepared in cooperation with the department of environmental management, the statewide planning program, and the commerce corporation, with the involvement of such other state agencies as may be appropriate, and with such technical support as may be necessary and appropriate from the Narragansett Bay Estuary Program, the Coastal Institute at the University of Rhode Island, and Rhode Island Sea Grant.

The plan shall be responsive to the requirements and principles of the federal coastal zone management act as amended, including, but not limited to, the expectations of the act for incorporating the federal Clean Water Act into coastal zone management programs.

The marine resources development plan shall take into account local land use management responsibilities as provided for under title 45 and harbor management responsibilities, and the preparation of the plan shall include opportunities for involvement and/or comment by cities and towns.

The marine resources development plan shall be adopted by the council in accordance with the provisions of this subsection by July 1, 2005, shall as appropriate incorporate the recommendations of the Governor’s Narragansett Bay and Watershed Planning Commission, and shall be made consistent with systems level plans as appropriate, in order to effectuate the purposes of systems level planning. The council shall update the marine resources development plan at least once every five (5) years.

The council shall administer its programs, regulations, and implementation activities in a manner consistent with the marine resources development plan.

The marine resources development plan and any updates thereto shall be adopted as appropriate as elements of the state guide plan pursuant to §

42-11-10

.

Special area management plans.

The council shall adopt such special area management plans as deemed necessary and desirable to provide for the integration and coordination of the protection of natural resources, the promotion of reasonable coastal-dependent economic growth, and the improved protection of life and property in the specific areas designated council as requiring such integrated planning and coordination.

The integrated planning and coordination herein specified shall include, but not be limited to, federal agencies, state agencies, boards, commissions, and corporations, including specifically the commerce corporation, and cities and towns, shall utilize to the extent appropriate and feasible the capacities of entities of higher education, including Rhode Island Sea Grant, and shall provide for the participation of advocacy groups, community-based organizations, and private persons.

The council shall administer its programs, regulations, and implementation activities in a manner consistent with special area management plans.

Special area management plans and any updates thereto shall be adopted as appropriate as elements of the state guide plan pursuant to §

42-11-10

.

Implementation.

The council is authorized to formulate policies and plans and to adopt regulations necessary to implement its various management programs. With respect to such policies and plans which relate to matters where the coastal resources management council and the department of environmental management have concurrent jurisdiction and upon formulation of the plans and regulations, the council shall, prior to adoption, submit the proposed plans or regulations to the director of the department of environmental management for the director’s review. The director shall review and submit comments to the council within thirty (30) days of submission to the director by the council. The comments of the director shall include findings with regard to the consistency of the policies, plans and/or regulations with the requirements of laws administered by the department. The council shall consider the director’s comments prior to adoption of any such policies, plans or regulations and shall respond in writing to findings of the director with regard to the consistency of said policies, plans and/or regulations with the requirements of laws administered by the department.

The council shall have exclusive jurisdiction below mean high water for all development, operations, and dredging, consistent with the requirements of chapter 6.1 of this title and except as necessary for the department of environmental management to exercise its powers and duties and to fulfill its responsibilities pursuant to §§

42-17.1-2

and

42-17.1-24

, and any person, firm, or governmental agency proposing any development or operation within, above, or beneath the tidal water below the mean high water mark, extending out to the extent of the state’s jurisdiction in the territorial sea, shall be required to demonstrate that its proposal would not:

Conflict with any resources management plan or program;

Make any area unsuitable for any uses or activities to which it is allocated by a resources management plan or program adopted by the council; or

Significantly damage the environment of the coastal region.

The council shall be authorized to approve, modify, set conditions for, or reject any such proposal.

The authority of the council over land areas (those areas above the mean high water mark) shall be limited to two hundred feet (200´) from the coastal physiographic feature or to that necessary to carry out effective resources management programs. This shall be limited to the authority to approve, modify, set conditions for, or reject the design, location, construction, alteration, and operation of specified activities or land uses when these are related to a water area under the agency’s jurisdiction, regardless of their actual location. The council’s authority over these land uses and activities shall be limited to situations in which there is a reasonable probability of conflict with a plan or program for resources management or damage to the coastal environment. These uses and activities are:

Power generating over forty (40) megawatts and desalination plants.

Chemical or petroleum processing, transfer, or storage.

Minerals extraction.

Shoreline protection facilities and physiographical features, and all directly associated contiguous areas which are necessary to preserve the integrity of the facility and/or features.

Coastal wetlands and all directly associated contiguous areas which are necessary to preserve the integrity of the wetlands including any freshwater wetlands located in the vicinity of the coast. The actual determination of freshwater wetlands located in coastal vicinities and under the jurisdiction of the coastal resources management council shall be designated on such maps that are agreed to in writing and made available for public use by the coastal resources management council and the director, department of environmental management, within three (3) months of [August 6, 1996]. The CRMC shall have exclusive jurisdiction over the wetlands areas described in this section notwithstanding any provision of chapter 1, title 2 or any other provision, except as provided in subsection (iv) of this section. Within six (6) months of [August 6, 1996] the council in cooperation with the director shall develop rules and regulations for the management and protection of freshwater wetlands, affected by an aquaculture project, outside of those freshwater wetlands located in the vicinity of the coast and under the exclusive jurisdiction of the director of the department of environmental management. For the purpose of this chapter, a “coastal wetland” means any salt marsh bordering on the tidal waters of this state, whether or not the tidal waters reach the littoral areas through natural or artificial watercourses, and those uplands directly associated and contiguous thereto which are necessary to preserve the integrity of that marsh. Marshes shall include those areas upon which grow one or more of the following: smooth cordgrass (spartina alterniflora), salt meadow grass (spartina patens), spike grass (distichlis spicata), black rush (juncus gerardi), saltworts (salicornia spp.), sea lavender (limonium carolinianum), saltmarsh bulrushes (scirpus spp.), hightide bush (iva frutescens), tall reed (phragmites communis), tall cordgrass (spartina pectinata), broadleaf cattail (typha latifolia), narrowleaf cattail (typha angustifolia), spike rush (eleocharis rostellata), chairmaker’s rush (scirpus amercana), creeping bentgrass (agrostis palustris), sweet grass (hierochloe odorata), and wild rye (etlymus virginicus).

Sewage treatment and disposal and solid waste disposal facilities.

Beneficial use, dewatering, and disposal of dredged material of marine origins, where such activities take place within two hundred feet (200´) of mean high water or a coastal physiographic feature, or where there is a reasonable probability of conflict with a plan or program for resources management or damage to the coastal environment.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (ii) and (iii) above, the department of environmental management shall maintain jurisdiction over the administration of chapter 1, title 2, including permitting of freshwater wetlands alterations and enforcement, with respect to all agricultural activities undertaken by a farmer, as that term is defined in §

2-1-22(j)

, wherever located; provided, however, that with respect to activities located partially or completely within two hundred feet (200´) of the coastal physiographic feature, the department shall exercise jurisdiction in consultation with the council.

Coordination. The council has the following coordinating powers and duties:

Functioning as a binding arbitrator in any matter of dispute involving both the resources of the state’s coastal region and the interests of two (2) or more municipalities or state agencies.

Consulting and coordinating actions with local, state, regional, and federal agencies and private interests.

Conducting or sponsoring coastal research.

Advising the governor, the general assembly, and the public on coastal matters.

Serving as the lead state agency and initial and primary point of contact for dredging activities in tidal waters and in that capacity, integrating and coordinating the plans and policies of other state agencies as they pertain to dredging in order to develop comprehensive programs for dredging as required by subparagraph (1)(ii)(H) of this section and chapter 6.1 of this title. The Rhode Island resource recovery corporation prior to purchasing cover material for the state landfill shall first contact the CRMC to see if there is a source of suitable dredged material available which shall be used in place of the purchase cover material. Other state agencies engaged in the process of dump closures shall also contact the CRMC to see if there is a source of suitable dredged material available, which shall be used in place of the purchase cover material. In addition, cities and towns may contact the CRMC prior to closing city or town controlled dump sites to see if there is a source of suitable dredge material available, which may be used in place of the purchase cover material.

Acting as the state’s representative to all bodies public and private on all coastal and aquaculture related matters.

Operations. The council is authorized to exercise the following operating functions, which are essential to management of coastal resources:

Issue, modify, or deny permits for any work in, above, or beneath the areas under its jurisdiction, including conduct of any form of aquaculture.

Issue, modify, or deny permits for dredging, filling, or any other physical alteration of coastal wetlands and all directly related contiguous areas which are necessary to preserve the integrity of the wetlands, including, but not limited to, the transportation and disposal of dredge materials in the tidal waters.

Grant licenses, permits, and easements for the use of coastal resources which are held in trust by the state for all its citizens, and impose fees for private use of these resources.

Determining the need for and establishing pierhead, bulkhead, and harbor lines.

Enforcing and implementing riparian rights in the tidal waters after judicial decisions.

The council may require an owner or operator of a commercial wharf or pier of a marine commercial facility, as defined in 300.3 of the Rhode Island coastal resources management program, but not including those facilities defined in 300.4 of the Rhode Island coastal resources management program, and which is capable of offloading cargo, and is or will be subject to a new use or a significant intensification of an existing use, to demonstrate that the commercial wharf or pier is fit for that purpose. For the purposes of this subsection, a “commercial wharf or pier” means a pier, bulkhead, wharf, docking facility, or underwater utilities. The council may order said owner or operator to provide an engineering certification to the council’s satisfaction that the commercial wharf or pier is fit for the new use or intensification of an existing use. If the council determines that the commercial wharf or pier is not fit, it may order the owner or operator to undertake the necessary work to make the commercial wharf or pier safe, within a reasonable time frame. If the council determines that the commercial wharf or pier, because of is condition, is an immediate threat to public health and safety it may order the commercial wharf or pier closed until the necessary work to make the commercial wharf or pier safe has been performed and approved by the council. All work performed must conform to the council’s management program. The council is also given the authority to develop regulations to carry out this provision and to impose administrative penalties of five thousand dollars ($5,000) per day up to a maximum of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) consistent with §

46-23-7.1

where there has been a violation of the orders under this provision.

Rights-of-way.

The council is responsible for the designation of all public rights-of-way to the tidal water areas of the state, and shall carry on a continuing discovery of appropriate public rights-of-way to the tidal water areas of the state.

The council shall maintain a complete file of all official documents relating to the legal status of all public rights-of-way to the tidal water areas of the state.

The council has the power to designate for acquisition and development, and posting, and all other functions of any other department for tidal rights-of-way and land for tidal rights-of-way, parking facilities, and other council related purposes.

Further, the council has the power to develop and prescribe a standard sign to be used by the cities and towns to mark designated rights-of-way.

In conjunction with this subdivision, every state department controlling state-owned land close to or adjacent to discovered rights-of-way is authorized to set out the land, or so much of the land that may be deemed necessary for public parking.

No use of land for public parking shall conflict with existing or intended use of the land, and no improvement shall be undertaken by any state agency until detailed plans have been submitted to and approved by the governing body of the local municipality.

In designating rights-of-way, the council shall consider the following matters in making its designation:

Land evidence records;

The exercise of domain over the parcel such as maintenance, construction, or upkeep;

The payment of taxes;

The creation of a dedication;

Public use;

Any other public record or historical evidence such as maps and street indexes;

Other evidence as set out in §

42-35-10

.

A determination by the council that a parcel is a right-of-way shall be decided by substantial evidence.

The council shall be notified whenever by the judgment of the governing body of a coastal municipality, a public right-of-way to tidal water areas located in such municipality has ceased to be useful to the public, and such governing body proposes an order of abandonment of such public right-of-way. Said notice shall be given not less than sixty (60) days prior to the date of such abandonment.

Pre-existing residential boating facilities.

The council is hereby authorized and empowered to issue assent for pre-existing residential boating facilities constructed prior to January 1, 1985. These assents may be issued for pre-existing residential boating facilities, even though such facilities do not meet current standards and policies of the council; provided, however, that the council finds that such facilities do not pose any significant risk to the coastal resources of the state of Rhode Island and do not endanger human safety.

In addition to the above criteria, the applicant shall provide clear and convincing evidence that:

The facility existed in substantially the same configuration as it now exists prior to January 1, 1985;

The facility is presently intact and functional; and

The facility presents no significant threat to the coastal resources of the state of Rhode Island or human safety.

The applicant, to be eligible for this provision, shall apply no later than January 31, 1999.

The council is directed to develop rules and regulations necessary to implement this subdivision.

It is the specific intent of this subsection to require that all pre-existing residential boating facilities constructed on January 1, 1985, or thereafter conform to this chapter and the plans, rules and regulations of the council.

Lease of filled lands which were formerly tidal lands to riparian or littoral owners.

Any littoral or riparian owner in this state who desires to obtain a lease from the state of Rhode Island of any filled lands adjacent to his or her upland shall apply to the council, which may make the lease. Any littoral or riparian owner who wishes to obtain a lease of filled lands must obtain pre-approval, in the form of an assent, from the council. Any lease granted by the council shall continue the public’s interest in the filled lands including, but not limited to, the rights of navigation, fishery, and commerce. The public trust in the lands shall continue and run concurrently with the leasing of the lands by the state to private individuals, corporations, or municipalities. Upon the granting of a lease by the council, those rights consistent with the public trust and secured by the lease shall vest in the lessee. The council may approve a lease of filled lands for an initial term of up to fifty (50) years, with, or without, a single option to renew for an additional term of up to fifty (50) years.

The lessor of the lease, at any time, for cause, may by express act cancel and annul any lease previously made to the riparian owner when it determines that the use of the lands is violating the terms of the lease or is inconsistent with the public trust, and upon cancellation the lands, and rights in the land so leased, shall revert to the state.

“Marinas” as defined in the coastal resources management program in effect as of June 1, 1997, are deemed to be one of the uses consistent with the public trust. Subdivision (7) is not applicable to:

Any riparian owner on tidal waters in this state (and any successor in interest to the owner) which has an assent issued by the council to use any land under water in front of his or her lands as a marina, which assent was in effect on June 1, 1997;

Any alteration, expansion, or other activity at a marina (and any successor in interest) which has an assent issued by the council, which assent was in effect on June 1, 1997; and

Any renewal of assent to a marina (or successor in interest), which assent was issued by the council and in effect on June 1, 1997.

“Recreational boating facilities” including marinas, launching ramps, and recreational mooring areas, as defined by and properly permitted by the council, are deemed to be one of the uses consistent with the public trust. Subdivision (7) is not applicable to:

Any riparian owner on tidal waters in this state (and any successor in interest to the owner) which has an assent issued by the council to use any land under water in front of his or her lands as a recreational boating facility; any alteration, expansion or other activity at a recreational boating facility (and any successor in interest) which has an assent issued by the council, which assent was in effect as of June 1, 1997; and

Any renewal of assent to a recreational boating facility (or successor in interest), which assent was issued by the council and in effect on June 1, 1997.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 279, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 329, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 270, §§ 1-3; P.L. 1984, ch. 244, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 10; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 21, § 4; P.L. 1993, ch. 311, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 420, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 153, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 76, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 196, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 89, § 1; 1996, ch. 271, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 274, § 3; P.L. 1996, ch. 281, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 404, § 40; P.L. 1998, ch. 332, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 501, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 314, § 3; P.L. 2001, ch. 144, § 6; P.L. 2001, ch. 163, § 6; P.L. 2004, ch. 145, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 260, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 454, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 154, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 185, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 196, § 1.

46-23-6.1.
Newport “cliff walk” — Public right-of-way — Legal studies.

The council is hereby directed to carry out any and all legal studies which it shall deem necessary in order to designate the Newport “cliff walk”, so called, as a public right-of-way pursuant to §

46-23-6(5)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 493, § 1.

46-23-6.2.
Abandonment of rights-of-way.

No city or town shall abandon a right-of-way designated as such by the council unless the council approved the abandonment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 42, § 1.

46-23-6.3.
Tolling of expiration periods.

Notwithstanding any other provision set forth in this chapter, all periods pertaining to the expiration of any approval or permit issued pursuant to any state statute or any regulation promulgated thereto pertaining to the development of property shall be tolled until June 30, 2016. For the purposes of this section, “tolling” means the suspension or temporary stopping of the running of the applicable permit or approval period.

Said tolling need not be recorded in the land evidence records to be valid, however, a notice of the tolling must be posted in the municipal planning department and near the land evidence records.

The tolling shall apply only to approvals or permits in effect on November 9, 2009, and those issued between November 9, 2009, and June 30, 2016, and shall not revive expired approvals or permits.

The expiration dates for all permits and approvals issued before the tolling period began will be recalculated as of July 1, 2016, by adding thereto the number of days between November 9, 2009, and the day on which the permit or approval would otherwise have expired. The expiration dates for all permits and approvals issued during the tolling period will be recalculated as of July 1, 2016, by adding thereto the number of days between the day the permit or approval was issued and the day the permit or approval otherwise would have expired.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 198, § 5; P.L. 2009, ch. 199, § 5; P.L. 2010, ch. 209, § 4; P.L. 2010, ch. 215, § 4; P.L. 2011, ch. 56, § 4; P.L. 2011, ch. 65, § 4; P.L. 2013, ch. 137, § 4; P.L. 2013, ch. 184, § 4; P.L. 2015, ch. 103, § 4; P.L. 2015, ch. 114, § 4.

46-23-7.
Violations.

In any instances wherein there is a violation of the coastal resources management program, or a violation of regulations or decisions of the council, the commissioner of coastal resources management shall have the power to order any person to cease and desist or to remedy any violation of any provisions of this chapter, or any rule, regulation, assent, order, or decision of the council whenever the commissioner of coastal resources management shall have reasonable grounds to believe that such violation has occurred.

Council staff, conservation officers within the department of environmental management, and state and municipal police shall be empowered to issue written cease and desist orders in any instance where activity is being conducted which constitutes a violation of any provisions of this chapter, or any rule, regulation, assent, order, or decision of the council.

Conservation officers within the department of environmental management, council staff, and state and municipal police shall have authority to apply to a court of competent jurisdiction for a warrant to enter on private land to investigate possible violations of this chapter; provided, that they have reasonable grounds to believe that a violation has been committed, is being committed, or is about to be committed.

Any order or notice issued pursuant to subsection (a) shall be eligible for recordation under chapter 13 of title 34, and shall be recorded in the land evidence records in the city/town wherein the property subject to the order is located, and any subsequent transferee of the property shall be responsible for complying with the requirements of the order and notice.

The coastal resources management council shall discharge of record any notice filed pursuant to subsection (b) within thirty (30) days after the violation has been remedied.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 279, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 197, § 2; P.L. 1976, ch. 329, § 2; P.L. 1977, ch. 270, § 4; P.L. 1980, ch. 208, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 296, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 193, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 516, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 10.

46-23-7.1.
Administrative penalties.

Any person who violates, or refuses or fails to obey, any notice or order issued pursuant to §

46-23-7(a)

; or any assent, order, or decision of the council, may be assessed an administrative penalty by the chairperson or executive director in accordance with the following:

The chairperson or executive director is authorized to assess an administrative penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation of this section, and is authorized to assess additional penalties of not more than one thousand ($1,000) for each day during which this violation continues after receipt of a cease-and-desist order from the council pursuant to §

46-23-7(a)

, but in no event shall the penalties in aggregate exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). Prior to the assessment of a penalty under this subdivision, the property owner or person committing the violation shall be notified by certified mail or personal service that a penalty is being assessed. The notice shall include a reference to the section of the law, rule, regulation, assent, order, or permit condition violated; a concise statement of the facts alleged to constitute the violation; a statement of the amount of the administrative penalty assessed; and a statement of the party’s right to an administrative hearing.

The party shall have twenty-one (21) days from receipt of the notice within which to deliver to the council a written request for a hearing. This request shall specify in detail the statements contested by the party. The executive director shall designate a person to act as hearing officer. If no hearing is requested, then after the expiration of the twenty-one (21) day period, the council shall issue a final order assessing the penalty specified in the notice. The penalty is due when the final order is issued. If the party shall request a hearing, any additional daily penalty shall not commence to accrue until the council issues a final order.

If a violation is found to have occurred, the council may issue a final order assessing not more than the amount of the penalty specified in the notice. The penalty is due when the final order is issued.

The party may within thirty (30) days appeal the final order, of fine assessed by the council to the superior court which shall hear the assessment of the fine de novo.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 516, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 42, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 352, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 213, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 301, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 6, § 7, effective July 1, 2021.

46-23-7.2.
Proceedings for enforcement.

The superior court shall have jurisdiction to enforce the provisions of this chapter, the coastal resource management program, or any rule, regulation, assent, or order issued pursuant thereto. Proceedings under this section may follow the course of equity, and shall be instituted and prosecuted in the name of and at the direction of the chairperson and council by the attorney general or counsel designated by the council. Proceedings provided in this section shall be in addition to, and may be utilized in lieu of, other administrative or judicial proceedings authorized by this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 516, § 2.

46-23-7.3.
Criminal penalties.

Any person who knowingly violates any provision of this chapter, the coastal resources management program, or any rule, regulation, assent, or order shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment of not more than three (3) months or both; and each day the violation is continued or repeated shall be deemed a separate offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 516, § 2; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 6, § 7, effective July 1, 2021.

46-23-7.4.
Penalty for blocking or posting of rights-of-way.

Any person who shall post or block any tidal water, public right-of-way, as designated by the council, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment for not more than three (3) months or both; and each day the posting or blocking continues or is repeated shall be deemed a separate offense. The chairperson of the council, through council’s legal counsel or the attorney general, may apply to any court of competent jurisdiction for an injunction to prevent the unlawful posting or blocking of any tidal water, public right-of-way.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 516, § 2; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 6, § 7, effective July 1, 2021.

46-23-7.5.
Prosecution of criminal violations.

The chairperson and anyone designated by the chairperson, without being required to enter into any recognizance or to give surety for cost, may institute proceedings in the name of the state. It shall be the duty of the attorney general and/or the solicitor of the city or town in which the alleged violation has occurred to conduct the prosecution of all the proceedings. The chairperson may delegate his or her authority to bring prosecution by complaint and warrant to any law enforcement officials authorized by law to bring complaints for the issuance of search or arrest warrants pursuant to chapters 5 and 6 of title 12.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 516, § 2.

46-23-8.
Gifts, grants, and donations.

The council is authorized to receive any gifts, grants, or donations made for any of the purposes of its program, which shall be deposited as general revenues, and to disburse and administer the gifts, grants, or donations amounts appropriated in accordance with the terms thereof. The council is authorized to receive any sums provided by an applicant for use by the council in its hearing process, which shall be deposited as general revenues, and to disburse and administer the general revenue amounts appropriated in accordance with the rules and regulations promulgated by the council.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 279, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 10; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 162.

46-23-9.
Subpoena.

The council is hereby authorized and empowered to summon witnesses and issue subpoenas in substantially the following form:

Sc. To of greeting: You are hereby required, in the name of the state of Rhode Island, to make your appearance before the commission on in the city of on the day of to give evidence of what you know relative to a matter upon investigation by the commission on and produce and then and there have and give the following: Hereof fail not, as you will answer to default under the penalty of the law in that behalf made and provided. Dated at the day of in the year .

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 279, § 1.

46-23-10.
Cooperation of departments.

All other departments and agencies and bodies of state government are hereby authorized and directed to cooperate with and furnish such information as the council shall require.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 279, § 1.

46-23-11.
Rules and regulations.

The rules and regulations promulgated by the council shall be subject to the Administrative Procedures Act.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 279, § 1.

46-23-12.
Representation from coastal communities.

Upon the expiration of a term of a member appointed by the governor, as an appointed or elected official of local government from a coastal municipality as set out in §

46-23-2

, the governor shall appoint an appointed or elected official of a coastal municipality which, at the time of the governor’s appointment, has no appointed or ex officio representation on the council.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 279, § 1.

46-23-13.
Application and hearing fees.

The council shall be authorized to establish reasonable fees for applications and hearings. All fees collected by the council, including fees collected for leases, shall be deposited as general revenues. The state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for payment of such sum or sums as may be necessary from time to time and upon receipt by him or her of duly authenticated vouchers presented by the commissioner of coastal resources management.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1989, ch. 399, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 10; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 162.

46-23-14.
Expert testimony.

The council shall be authorized to engage its own expert and outside consultants, and the council shall be empowered to use that testimony in making its decisions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 197, § 3.

46-23-15.
Federal grants and interstate cooperation.

The council is authorized to accept any federal grants. It is further given the power to administer land and water use regulations as necessary to fulfill their responsibilities under the Federal Coastal Zone Management Act, 16 U.S.C. § 1451 et seq., and to acquire fee simple and less than fee simple interests under any federal or state program. The council is authorized to coordinate and cooperate with other states in furtherance of its purposes. The council may expend those grants and appropriations. The coastal resources management council for the purposes of the federal Coastal Zone Management Act, 16 U.S.C. § 1451 et seq., is the coastal zone agency under §§ 301 through 313 and §§ 318 and 6217 of said act.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1991, ch. 332, § 3; P.L. 1995, ch. 76, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 196, § 1.